Tennessee, session 114, SB0423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-2-103(d), is amended by deleting
"two (2) conspicuous places" and substituting "three (3) conspicuous places".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0423
002092
- 1 -